Maryland, session 2026, HB1155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 5 – Calvert County
6–103.
(a) When it is advantageous to the county to do so, the county may contract to
purchase supplies or services for periods of more than one year if:
(1) Funds for the total cost of the contract are available at the time the
contract is executed; or
(2) Subject to Subsection (c) of this section, a contract requiring the
payment of funds from appropriations of more than one fiscal year is approved by resolution
of the Commissioners.
(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (a) of this section, the County may enter into a
contract for solid waste disposal that:
(1) May include transportation;
(2) May require payment of funds from appropriations of the County or
receipt of payment to the County; and
(3) Is not for more than a twenty–year initial term.
– 1 –

Ch. 148 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) A contract requiring the payment of funds from appropriations of more than
one fiscal year, approved by resolution of the Commissioners, shall be awarded as:
(1) A one–year contract with the option to renew for not more than four
one–year terms for a contract that is not governed by item (2) of this Subsection; or
(2) A multiyear contract for a period not to exceed 20 years, including the
initial contract term and all options, if the contract is for:
(i) Banking and investment services;
(ii) Retirement and pension system management;
(iii) Health insurance; or
(iv) Information technology, including software and the provision of
voice, data, and Internet services.
(d) (1) Notwithstanding Subsection (a) of this section, the County may enter
into [a] THE FOLLOWING CONTRACTS IF THE INITIAL TERM OF THE CONTRACT OR
LEASE IS NOT MORE THAN 20 YEARS:
(I) A contract for a cellular tower lease, including a cellular tower
lease on a water tower[, if the initial term of the lease is not more than 20 years]; AND
(II) CONTRACTS FOR INFRASTRUCTURE OR ASSET
MANAGEMENT PROGRAMS IF THE INFRASTRUCTURE OR ASSET HAS A LIFE CYCLE OF
NOT LESS THAN 15 YEARS, INCLUDING WATER TOWERS, FLOW METERS, AND OTHER
WATER AND SEWER ASSETS.
(2) A CONTRACT FOR INFRASTRUCTURE OR AN ASSET MANAGEMENT
PROGRAM UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY INCLUDE THE
PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION, MAINTENANCE, MODIFICATION,
REVITALIZATION, AND DECOMMISSIONING OF THE INFRASTRUCTURE OR ASSET.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –